Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.405.040

Disqualification for failure to emphasize patriotism—Penalty.

(1) No person, whose certificate or permit authorizing him or her to teach in the common schools of this state has been revoked due to his or her failure to endeavor to impress on the minds of his or her pupils the principles of patriotism, or to train them up to the true comprehension of the rights, duty and dignity of American citizenship, shall be permitted to teach in any common school in this state.

(2) Any person teaching in any school in violation of this section, and any school director knowingly permitting any person to teach in any school in violation of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

[ 2003 c 53 s 167; 1990 c 33 s 384; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.67.030. Prior: 1919 c 38 s 2; RRS s 4846. Formerly RCW 28A.67.030, 28.67.030.]

NOTES:

Intent—Effective date—2003 c 53: See notes following RCW 2.48.180.